Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
CHAPTER 13 Commercial Feeds

Administrative rules and regulations.

Commercial feeding stuffs, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Agriculture, Chapter 40-5.

Grain dealers, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Agriculture, Chapter 40-25.

2-13-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Brand name” means any word, name, symbol, or device or any combination thereof identifying the commercial feed of a distributor or licensee and distinguishing it from that of others.

“Commercial feed” means all materials except whole, unmixed seed, when not adulterated within the meaning of Code Section 2-13-10, which are distributed for use as feed or for mixing in feed, provided that the Commissioner, by regulation, may exempt from this definition or from specific provisions of this chapter commodities such as hay, straw, stover, silage, cobs, husks, hulls, raw meat, and individual chemical compounds or substances when such materials are not intermixed or mixed with other materials and are not adulterated within the meaning of Code Section 2-13-10.

“Customer-formula feed” means commercial feed which consists of a mixture of commercial feeds, feed ingredients, or both, each batch of which is manufactured according to the specific instructions of the final purchaser.

“Distribute” means to offer for sale, sell, exchange, or barter commercial feed.

“Distributor” means any person who distributes.

“Drug” means any article intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in animals other than man and any article other than feed intended to affect the structure or any function of the animal body.

“Feed ingredient” means each of the constituent materials making up a commercial feed.

“Label” means a display of written, printed, or graphic matter upon or affixed to the container in which a commercial feed is distributed or on the invoice or delivery slip with which a commercial feed is distributed.

“Labeling” means all labels and other written, printed, or graphic matter upon a commercial feed or any of its containers or wrappers or accompanying such commercial feed.

(9.1)

“Licensee” means a person who obtains a commercial feed license.

“Manufacture” means to grind, mix or blend, or package or to process further a commercial feed for distribution.

“Mineral feed” means a commercial feed intended to supply primarily mineral elements or inorganic nutrients.

“Official sample” means a sample of feed taken by the Commissioner or his agent in accordance with subsection (c), (e), or (f) of Code Section 2-13-13.

“Owner” means a corporation or the stockholders thereof, a partnership, or an individual.

“Percent” or “percentages” means percentages by weight.

“Person” includes an individual, a partnership, a corporation, and an association.

“Pet” means any domesticated animal normally maintained in or near the household of its owner.

“Pet food” means any commercial feed prepared and distributed for consumption by dogs or cats.

“Product name” means the name of the commercial feed which identifies it as to kind, class, or specific use.

(18.1)

“Specialty pet” means any domesticated animal normally maintained in a cage or tank, such as, but not limited to, gerbils, hamsters, birds, fish, and turtles.

(18.2)

“Specialty pet food” means any commercial feed prepared and distributed for consumption by specialty pets, but not including feeds for horses, rabbits, and wild birds.

“Ton” means a net weight of 2,000 pounds avoirdupois.

History.

Code 1933, § 42-202, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 10, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3018, § 1.

2-13-2.
Commissioner to administer chapter.

This chapter shall be administered by the Commissioner of Agriculture.

History.

Code 1933, § 42-201, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 10, § 1.

2-13-3.
Cooperation with other agencies and associations.

The Commissioner may cooperate and enter into agreements with governmental agencies of this state, other states, agencies of the federal government, and private associations in order to carry out the purpose and provisions of this chapter.

History.

Code 1933, § 42-215, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 10, § 1.

2-13-4.
Publication of information as to sales, production, use, and analyses.

The Commissioner may publish, in such forms as he may deem proper, information concerning the sales of commercial feeds, together with such data on their production and use as he may consider advisable and a report of the results of the analyses of official samples of commercial feeds sold within this state as compared with the analyses guaranteed in the registration and on the label. The information concerning production and use of commercial feed shall not disclose the operations of any person.

History.

Code 1933, § 42-216, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 10, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3018, § 2.

2-13-5.
Disclosure of protected information.

Any person who uses to his own advantage or reveals to anyone other than the Commissioner, officers of the department, or the courts, when relevant in any judicial proceeding, any information acquired under the authority of this chapter concerning any method, records, formulations, or processes which as trade secrets are entitled to protection, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, provided that this prohibition shall not be deemed to prohibit the Commissioner or his duly authorized agent from exchanging information of a regulatory nature with duly appointed officials of the United States government or the governments of other states, when such officials are similarly prohibited by law from revealing this information.

History.

Code 1933, § 42-211, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 10, § 1.

2-13-6.
License required for distribution; product registration; fees;
refusal or cancellation of license or registration.

No person who manufactures a commercial feed within this state or whose name appears on the label of a commercial feed (guarantor), shall distribute a commercial feed in this state without first obtaining a commercial feed license from the Commissioner. No distributor may cause a commercial feed to be distributed in this state without first obtaining a commercial feed license; provided, however, that the Commissioner by rule or regulation may exempt certain distributors. Application for a commercial feed license shall be made on forms provided by the Commissioner that identify the manufacturer’s or guarantor’s or distributor’s name, place of business, and location of each manufacturing facility in the state and such other appropriate information as may be deemed necessary for enforcement of this chapter.

All licenses shall expire on December 31 of each year. Licenses are not transferable and no credit or refund may be granted for licenses held for less than one full year. All commercial feed licenses must be renewed by January 1 of each year. The license fee shall be based upon the number of tons of commercial feed distributed in this state during the preceding 12 month period ending December 31, provided that tonnage of small-package products subject to registration as specified in subsection (d) of this Code section shall not be used in calculating the license fee due. The amount of the license fee shall be based upon the schedule as prescribed in the rules and regulations of the Commissioner but shall not be less than $75.00 nor more than $2,000.00 per annum. Any fees collected pursuant to this Code section shall be retained pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 45-12-92.1.

A commercial feed license must be renewed annually and fees shall be paid by January 31 of each calendar year, or the applicable license fee shall increase in the manner prescribed in the rules and regulations of the Commissioner.

No licensee shall distribute in this state a pet food or a specialty pet food in packages of ten pounds or less which has not been registered. The application for registration shall be submitted to the Commissioner on forms furnished by or acceptable to the Commissioner. All registrations expire on December 31 of each year. An annual registration fee of an amount prescribed in the rules and regulations of the Commissioner is due by January 1. Such registration fee shall be $40.00 per product registered, provided that the total of all such registration fees shall not exceed $2,000.00 per annum for any licensee.

Annual registration fees received after January 31 shall be subject to a delinquent penalty as prescribed in the rules and regulations of the Commissioner.

The license and registration fees provided by this Code section shall not exceed a total amount of $2,000.00 per annum for any licensee.

The Commissioner is empowered to refuse the commercial feed license application or product registration of any firm not deemed to be in compliance with the provisions of this chapter and to cancel any commercial feed licenses or product registrations subsequently found not to be in compliance with this chapter, provided that no commercial feed license or product registration shall be refused or canceled unless the licensee has been given an opportunity to be heard before the Commissioner and to amend his application or take corrective action in order to comply with the requirements of this chapter.

The Commissioner may request copies of labels and labeling in order to determine compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 213, § 3; Code 1933, § 42-203, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 10, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3018, § 3; Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-12/HB 1055.

Cross references.

Annual license fee for grain dealers, commercial feed dealers, and grain warehousemen, §

2-1-5

.

2-13-7.
Compliance with Chapter 5 of this title.

Every nonresident licensee, at the time of licensing and before distributing commercial feed in this state, shall comply with Chapter 5 of this title, the “Department of Agriculture Registration, License, and Permit Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 213, § 10; Code 1933, § 42-213, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 10, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3018, § 4.

Cross references.

Maintenance of registered office and registered agents in state by corporations, §

14-2-501

et seq.

2-13-8.
Labeling requirements.

A commercial feed, other than a customer-formula feed, shall be accompanied by a label bearing the following information:

The net weight, which may be stated in metric units in addition to the required avoirdupois units;

The product name and the brand name, if any, under which the commercial feed is distributed;

The guaranteed analysis stated in such terms as the Commissioner, by regulation, determines is required to advise the user of the composition of the feed or to support claims made in the labeling. In all cases the substances or elements must be determinable by laboratory methods, such as the methods published by the Association of Official Analytical Chemists;

The common or usual name of each ingredient used in the manufacture of the commercial feed, listed in descending order of predominance by weight; provided, however, that for any commercial feed other than equine feed, the Commissioner, by regulation, may permit the use of a collective term for a group of ingredients which performs a similar function or exempt such commercial feeds or any group thereof from this requirement of an ingredient statement if the Commissioner finds that such statement is not required in the interest of consumers;

The name and the principal mailing address of the manufacturer or the person responsible for distributing the commercial feed;

Adequate directions for use for all commercial feeds containing drugs and for such other feeds as the Commissioner may require by regulation as necessary for their safe and effective use; and

Such precautionary statements as the Commissioner, by regulation, determines are necessary for the safe and effective use of the commercial feed.

A customer-formula feed shall be accompanied by a label, invoice, delivery slip, or other shipping document bearing the following information:

The name and address of the manufacturer;

The name and address of the purchaser;

The date of delivery;

The product name and brand name, if any, and the net weight of each commercial feed used in the mixture;

The net weight of every other ingredient used;

Adequate directions for use for all customer-formula feeds containing drugs and for such other feeds as the Commissioner may require, by regulation, as necessary for their safe and effective use;

Such precautionary statements as the Commissioner, by regulation, determines are necessary for the safe and effective use of the customer-formula feed; and

If a drug-containing product is used:

The purpose of the medication (claim statement); and

The established name of each active drug ingredient and the level of each drug used in the final mixture expressed in accordance with regulations.

History.

Code 1933, § 42-204, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 10, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3018, § 5; Ga. L. 2007, p. 165, § 1/HB 122.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Labeling, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Agriculture, Commercial Feeding Stuffs, Subject 40-5-2.

2-13-9.
When commercial feed deemed misbranded.

A commercial feed shall be deemed to be misbranded:

If its labeling is false or misleading in any particular;

If it is distributed under the name of another commercial feed;

If it is not labeled as required in Code Section 2-13-8;

If it purports to be or is represented as a commercial feed or if it purports to contain or is represented as containing a commercial feed ingredient, unless such commercial feed or feed ingredient conforms to the definition, if any, prescribed by regulation by the Commissioner; or

If any word, statement, or other information required by or under the authority of this chapter to appear on the label or labeling is not prominently placed thereon with such conspicuousness (as compared with other words, statements, designs, or devices in the labeling) and in such terms as to render it likely to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use.

History.

Code 1933, § 42-205, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 10, § 1.

2-13-10.
When commercial feed deemed adulterated.

A commercial feed shall be deemed to be adulterated:

If it bears or contains any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render it injurious to health, provided that, if the substance is not an added substance, such commercial feed shall not be considered adulterated under this paragraph if the quantity of such substance in such commercial feed does not ordinarily render it injurious to health;

If it bears or contains any added poisonous, added deleterious, or added nonnutritive substance which is unsafe within the meaning of Section 406 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, other than one which is:

A pesticide chemical in or on a raw agricultural commodity; or

A food additive;

If it is, bears, or contains any food additive which is unsafe within the meaning of Section 409 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;

If it is a raw agricultural commodity and it bears or contains a pesticide chemical which is unsafe within the meaning of Section 408(a) of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, provided that where a pesticide chemical has been used in or on a raw agricultural commodity in conformity with an exemption granted or a tolerance prescribed under Section 408 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act and such raw agricultural commodity has been subjected to processing, such as canning, cooking, freezing, dehydrating, or milling, the residue of such pesticide chemical remaining in or on such processed feed shall not be deemed unsafe if such residue in or on the raw agricultural commodity has been removed to the extent possible in good manufacturing practice and the concentration of such residue in the processed feed is not greater than the tolerance prescribed for the raw agricultural commodity, unless the feeding of such processed feed will result or is likely to result in a pesticide residue in the edible product of the animal which is unsafe within the meaning of Section 408(a) of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;

If it is, bears, or contains any color additive which is unsafe within the meaning of Section 706 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;

If any valuable constituent has been in whole or in part omitted or abstracted therefrom or replaced by any less valuable substance;

If its composition or quality falls below or differs from that which it is purported or is represented to possess by its labeling;

If it contains a drug and the methods used in or the facilities or controls used for its manufacture, processing, or packaging do not conform to current good manufacturing practice regulations promulgated by the Commissioner to assure that the drug meets the requirements of this chapter as to safety and has the identity and strength and meets the quality and purity characteristics which it purports or is represented to possess. In promulgating such regulations, the Commissioner shall adopt the current good manufacturing practice regulations for Type A medicated articles and Type B and Type C medicated feeds established under authority of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, unless he determines that they are not appropriate to the conditions which exist in this state;

If it contains viable or poisonous weed seeds in amounts exceeding the limits which the Commissioner shall establish by rule or regulation; or

If it is, or it bears or contains any new animal drug which is, unsafe within the meaning of Section 512 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.

History.

Code 1933, § 42-206, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 10, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3018, § 6.

U.S. Code.

The Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified at

21 U.S.C. § 301

et seq. Section 406 of the Act is codified at

21 U.S.C. § 346

. Section 408 of the Act is codified at

21 U.S.C. § 346

a. Section 409 of the Act is codified at

21 U.S.C. § 348

. Section 706 of the Act is codified at

21 U.S.C. § 376

.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Adulterants, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Agriculture, Commercial Feeding Stuffs, Subject 40-5-6.

2-13-11.
Prohibited acts.

The following acts and the causing thereof within this state are prohibited:

The manufacture or distribution of any commercial feed that is adulterated or misbranded;

The adulteration or misbranding of any commercial feed;

The distribution of agricultural commodities, such as whole seed, hay, straw, stover, silage, cobs, husks, and hulls, which are adulterated within the meaning of Code Section 2-13-10;

The removal or disposal of a commercial feed in violation of an order under Code Section 2-13-14;

The failure or refusal to obtain a commercial feed license or small package registration in accordance with Code Section 2-13-6;

The violation of Code Section 2-13-5; and

The waiving by the Commissioner of any penalties imposed under this chapter.

History.

Code 1933, § 42-207, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 10, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3018, § 7.

2-13-12.
Establishment of standards for feeds; adoption of rules and regulations.

The Commissioner is authorized to establish standards for commercial feeds.

The Commissioner is authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations for commercial feeds and pet foods as are specifically authorized in this chapter and such other reasonable rules and regulations as may be necessary for the efficient enforcement of this chapter. In the interest of uniformity, the Commissioner, by regulation, shall adopt, unless he determines that they are inconsistent with this chapter or are not appropriate to conditions which exist in this state, the following:

The official definitions of feed ingredients and official feed terms adopted by the Association of American Feed Control Officials, Incorporated, and published in the 1992 official publication of that organization and supplements thereto; and

Any regulation promulgated pursuant to the authority of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act and supplements thereto.

History.

Code 1933, § 42-208, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 10, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3018, § 8.

U.S. Code.

The Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified at

21 U.S.C. § 301

et seq.

2-13-13.
Inspections authorized; receipt for samples; warrant; methods of sampling and analysis generally; forwarding of results.

For the purpose of enforcing this chapter and in order to determine whether its provisions have been complied with, including whether or not any operations may be subject to such provisions, officers or employees duly designated by the Commissioner, upon presenting appropriate credentials to the owner, operator, or agent in charge, are authorized to enter, during normal business hours, any factory, warehouse, or establishment within this state in which commercial feeds are manufactured, processed, packed, or held for distribution and any vehicle being used to transport or hold such feeds and to inspect, at reasonable times, within reasonable limits, and in a reasonable manner, such factory, warehouse, establishment, or vehicle and all pertinent equipment, finished and unfinished materials, containers, and labeling therein. The inspection may include the verification of only such records and production and control procedures as may be necessary to determine compliance with the good manufacturing practice regulations established under paragraph (8) of Code Section 2-13-10. Each such inspection shall be commenced and completed with reasonable promptness. Upon completion of the inspection, the person in charge of the facility or vehicle shall be so notified.

If the officer or employee making such inspection of a factory, warehouse, or other establishment has obtained a sample in the course of the inspection, upon completion of the inspection and prior to leaving the premises he shall give to the owner, operator, or agent in charge thereof a receipt describing the samples obtained.

If the owner of any factory, warehouse, or establishment described in subsection (a) of this Code section or his agent refuses to admit the Commissioner or his agent to inspect the premises in accordance with subsection (a), the Commissioner is authorized to obtain from any court of this state a warrant directing such owner or his agent to submit the premises described in such warrant to inspection.

For the purpose of enforcing this chapter, the Commissioner or his duly designated agent is authorized to enter upon any public or private premises, including any vehicle of transport, during regular business hours, to have access to, to obtain samples of, and to examine records relating to distribution of commercial feeds.

Sampling and analysis shall be conducted in accordance with methods published by the Association of Official Analytical Chemists or with other generally recognized methods.

The results of all analyses of official samples shall be forwarded by the Commissioner to the person named on the label and to the purchaser. When the inspection and analysis of an official sample indicates that a commercial feed has been adulterated or misbranded and upon request within ten days following receipt of the analysis, the Commissioner shall furnish to the licensee a portion of the sample concerned.

The Commissioner, in determining for administrative purposes whether a commercial feed is deficient in any component, shall be guided by the official sample as defined in paragraph (12) of Code Section 2-13-1 and obtained and analyzed as provided for in subsections (c), (e), and (f) of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 213, §§ 5, 8; Ga. L. 1956, p. 346, § 8; Code 1933, § 42-209, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 10, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3018, § 9.

2-13-14.
Issuance and enforcement of withdrawal from distribution orders; condemnation and confiscation authorized; disposition of condemned feed.

Withdrawal from distribution orders. When the Commissioner or his authorized agent has reasonable cause to believe that any lot of commercial feed is being distributed in violation of this chapter or any of the prescribed regulations under this chapter, he may issue and enforce a written or printed withdrawal from distribution order, warning the distributor not to dispose of the lot of commercial feed in any manner until written permission is given by the Commissioner or the court. The Commissioner shall release the lot of commercial feed so withdrawn when such provisions and regulations have been complied with. If compliance is not obtained within 30 days, the Commissioner may begin, or upon request of the distributor or licensee shall begin, proceedings for condemnation.

Condemnation and confiscation. Any lot of commercial feed not in compliance with such provisions and regulations shall be subject to seizure on complaint of the Commissioner to the superior court of the county in which the commercial feed is located. If the court finds the commercial feed to be in violation of this chapter and orders the condemnation of the commercial feed, it shall be disposed of in any manner consistent with the quality of the commercial feed and the laws of this state, provided that in no instance shall the disposition of the commercial feed be ordered by the court without first giving the claimant an opportunity to apply to the court for release of the commercial feed or for permission to process or relabel the commercial feed to bring it into compliance with this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 213, § 13; Code 1933, § 42-210, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 10, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3018, § 10.

2-13-15 through 2-13-17.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 213, § 12; Ga. L. 1956, p. 346, § 3; Code 1933, § 42-211, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 10, § 1; Ga. L. 1945, p. 213, § 6; Ga. L. 1956, p. 346, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 2; Ga. L. 1945, p. 213, § 8; Ga. L. 1956, p. 346, § 2; repealed by Ga. L. 1992, p. 3018, §§ 11-13, effective May 4, 1992.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1992, p. 3018, §§ 11-13 repealed and reserved these Code section, effective May 4, 1992.

2-13-18.
Injunctions.

The Commissioner is authorized to apply for and the court to grant a temporary or permanent injunction restraining any person from violating or continuing to violate this chapter or any rule or regulation promulgated under this chapter, notwithstanding the existence of other remedies at law. Such injunction shall be issued without bond.

History.

Code 1933, § 42-211, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 10, § 1.

2-13-19.
Initiation of prosecutions.

It shall be the duty of the Attorney General or each district attorney of a superior court to whom any violation is reported by the Commissioner or his representative to cause appropriate proceedings to be instituted and prosecuted in a court of competent jurisdiction without delay. Before the Commissioner reports a violation for such prosecution, an opportunity shall be given the distributor to present his view to the Commissioner.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring the Commissioner or his representative to report for prosecution, to institute seizure proceedings, or to issue a withdrawal from distribution order as a result of minor violations of the chapter or when he believes the public interest will best be served by suitable notice or warning in writing.

History.

Code 1933, § 42-211, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 10, § 1.

2-13-20.
Certificate of state chemist or other state employee as prima-facie evidence.

In any controversy or prosecution arising under this chapter, a certificate of the state chemist or other state employee making an analysis or inspection, duly sworn to by the state chemist or the employee, shall be prima-facie evidence of the facts therein certified.

History.

Code 1933, § 42-214, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 10, § 1.

2-13-21.
Applicability of “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

The provisions of this chapter pertaining to rule making, the issuance, revocation, or denial of licenses and registrations, and other administrative actions authorized under this chapter shall be subject to and conducted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Code 1933, § 42-211, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 10, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3018, § 14.

2-13-22.
Exemptions from chapter; when chapter may be waived.

This chapter shall not apply to any commercial feeds that have been manufactured or produced by any person, partnership, firm, or corporation for the purpose of feeding his, their, or its own domestic animals, livestock, or poultry.

This chapter shall not apply to any commercial feeds whenever the purchaser of such commercial feeds desires to waive this chapter in regard to a particular manufacturer, seller, or producer of commercial feeds and the manufacturer, seller, or producer agrees to waive this chapter. No valid waiver may be executed unless the owner of the domestic animals, livestock, or poultry owns an interest in the feed manufacturing concern or the manufacturing concern owns an interest in the domestic animals, livestock, or poultry. The waiver shall be in writing, signed by both parties, and filed with the department. At any time after the waiver is on file, either party to the waiver may direct, in writing, that the department withdraw the waiver.

History.

Code 1933, § 42-212, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 10, § 1.

2-13-23.
Criminal penalty.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter or who impedes, hinders, or otherwise prevents or attempts to prevent the Commissioner or his duly authorized agent in the performance of his duty in connection with this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1933, §§ 42-211, 42-9922, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 10, § 1.